hu: Főzeterősségi beállítások: Erős; Egyéni; Enyhe; Normál; Egyéb
pl: Opcje mocy parzenia: Mocna; Niestandardowa; Łagodna; Standardowe; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Možnosti moči kave: Krepko; Po meri; Blago; Običajna; Druga
sv: Alternativ för bryggstyrka: Stark; Anpassad; Mild; Normal; Övrigt
fi: Kahvin vahvuusvaihtoehdot: Lihavoitu; Mukautettu; Lievä; Tavallinen; Muu
ru: Варианты крепости заваривания: Крепкий; Индивидуальная настройка; Мягкий; Стандартный; Другое
da: Bryggestyrkeindstillinger: Kraftig; Tilpasset; Mild; Almindelig; Andet
ko: 커피 추출 강도 옵션: 볼드; 커스텀; 마일드; 레귤러; 기타
tr: Demleme gücü seçenekleri: Yoğun; Özel; Hafif; Normal; Diğer
fr: Réglages d’intensité du café: Épaisse; Personnalisé; Modéré; Normal; Autre
de: Optionen für Brühstärke: Kräftig; Individuell; Leicht; Normal; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 冲泡浓度选项: 浓醇; 自定义; 柔和; 常规; 其他
th: ตัวเลือกความเข้มของการชงกาแฟ: หนา; กำหนดเอง; อ่อน; ธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
nb: Alternativer for bryggestyrke: Fet; Tilpasset; Mild; Vanlig; Annet
es: Opciones de intensidad de preparación: Intenso; Al gusto; Suave; Normal; Otros
sk-SK: Možnosti nastavenia sily kávy: Výrazný; Prispôsobený; Mierny; Bežný; Iné
bg-BG: Опции за сила на варенето: Наситено; Персонализирано; Леко; Обикновено; Друго
nl: Opties voor de brouwsterkte: Intens; Aangepast; Mild; Normaal; Overig
vi: Tùy chọn độ đậm khi pha: Đậm; Tùy chỉnh; Dịu nhẹ; Thông thường; Khác
zh-TW: 沖泡濃度選項: 濃郁; 客製化; 溫和; 一般; 其他
ro-RO: Opțiuni de intensitate a infuziei: Intens; Personalizat; Ușor; Normal; Altele
hr-HR: Opcije jačine napitka: Snažno; Prilagođeno; Blago; Regularni; Ostalo
en: Brew strength options: Bold; Custom; Mild; Regular; Other
pt-PT: Opções de intensidade do café: Forte; À medida; Médio; Normal; Outro
ja: 抽出濃度のオプション: 濃いめ; カスタム; マイルド; レギュラー; その他
pt-BR: Opções de intensidade do café: Forte; Personalizada; Suave; Regular; Outro
lt-LT: Kavos stiprumo parinktys: Stiprus; Pasirinktinis; Vidutinis; Įprastas; Kita
it: Opzioni di intensità dell'infusione: Grassetto; Personalizzato; Intensità lieve; Regular; Altro
cs: Možnosti síly kávy: Silné; Vlastní; Jemné; Běžné; Jiná
el: Επιλογές έντασης εκχύλισης: Δυνατός; Προσαρμοσμένος; Ήπιος; Κανονικός; Άλλο